Illinois, session 104th, HB4724.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Space Lands Acquisition and 5Development Act is amended by changing Section 13 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 35/13)  (from Ch. 85, par. 2113)7    Sec. 13. There is hereby created in the State Treasury the 8Open Space Lands Acquisition and Development Fund. The fund 9shall be used by the Department to make grants to local 10governments in the manner and for the purposes described in 11Section 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, moneys 12in the Open Space Lands Acquisition and Development Fund may 13not be appropriated, assigned, or transferred to another State 14fund. 15(Source: P.A. 86-925.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.